Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,181
Action based on strict liability in tort; brought against seller or lessor; when.

No product liability action based on the doctrine of strict liability in tort shall be commenced or maintained against any seller or lessor of a product which is alleged to contain or possess a defective condition unreasonably dangerous to the buyer, user, or consumer unless the seller or lessor is also the manufacturer of the product or the part thereof claimed to be defective.

Laws 1978, LB 665, § 3.